Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 596.995 is amended to read:
596.995. (1) Any manufacturer of an animal remedy, veterinary biologic or pharmaceutical who
violates  any  provision of ORS 596.100 or 596.105 applicable to manufacturers or any rule adopted
pursuant thereto or the terms or  conditions of any license, registration or order issued by the State
Department of Agriculture under ORS 596.100 or 596.105 shall be subject to  a civil penalty not to
exceed $2,500 per violation.
(2) Any person that violates any provision of ORS 596.075, 596.321, 596.331 (1), 596.351,
596.388, 596.392 (1) to (3) or (6), 596.404 to 596.416 or 596.460, any rule adopted pursuant
thereto or the terms or conditions  of any order of the department issued pursuant thereto
shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000 per violation.
(3) Any person that violates any provision of  ORS 596.331 (2), 596.355, 596.392 (4) or (5)
or 596.394 to 596.402, any rule adopted pursuant thereto or  the terms or conditions of any
order issued pursuant thereto shall be  subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 per vi-
olation.
(4) Civil penalties under this section are in addition to any other penalty provided by law.
[(2)] (5)  Each violation  described in this section  may be a separate and distinct offense, and,
in the case of a continuing violation,  each day’s continuance thereof may be deemed a separate and
distinct offense.
[(3)] (6)  The department shall adopt a schedule or schedules establishing the  amount of civil
penalty that may be imposed for a particular violation.
[(4)] (7)  Civil penalties under this section shall be imposed in the manner  provided in ORS
183.745.
(8) The department shall deposit all  moneys from penalties recovered under this section
into the Department of Agriculture Service Fund established by ORS 561.144. Moneys depos-
ited under this subsection are continuously appropriated to the department for carrying out
the administration and enforcement of the laws, rules or orders under which the  penalties
are assessed.
SECTION 2.
(1) Any person that violates  any provision of ORS 600.095 or a quarantine
imposed under ORS 600.105, any rule adopted pursuant thereto or the  terms or conditions
Enrolled Senate Bill 832 (SB 832-A) Page 1
of any order issued pursuant thereto shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000
per violation.
(2) Civil penalties under this section are in addition to any other penalty provided by  law.
(3) Each violation described  in this section may be a separate and distinct offense, and,
in the case of a continuing violation, each day’s continuance thereof may be deemed a sepa-
rate and distinct offense.
(4) The State Department of Agriculture shall  adopt a schedule or schedules establishing
the amount of civil penalty that may be imposed for a particular violation.
(5) Civil penalties  under this section shall be imposed in the manner provided in ORS
183.745.
(6) The department shall deposit all moneys from  penalties recovered under this section
into the Department of Agriculture Service Fund established by ORS 561.144. Moneys depos-
ited under this subsection are continuously appropriated to the department for carrying out
the administration and enforcement of the laws, rules or orders under which the penalties
are assessed.
SECTION 3.
(1) Any person that violates any provision of  ORS 633.006 to 633.089, any rule
adopted pursuant thereto or the terms or  conditions of any order issued pursuant thereto
shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 per violation.
(2) Civil penalties under this section are in addition to any other penalty provided by  law.
(3) Each violation described in this section may be a separate and  distinct offense, and,
in the case of a continuing violation, each day’s continuance thereof may be deemed a sepa-
rate and distinct offense.
(4) The State Department of Agriculture shall  adopt a schedule or schedules establishing
the amount of civil penalty that may be imposed for a particular violation.
(5) Civil penalties under this section shall be imposed in the manner provided  in ORS
183.745.
(6) The department shall deposit all  moneys from penalties recovered under this section
into the Department of Agriculture Service Fund established by ORS 561.144. Moneys depos-
ited under this subsection are continuously appropriated to the department for carrying out
the administration and enforcement of the laws, rules or orders under which the  penalties
are assessed.
(7) If a civil penalty under this  section remains unpaid after the date it becomes due and
owing as specified in the final order imposing the  civil penalty, in accordance with ORS
chapter 183 contested  case procedures and until the civil penalty is paid in full, the depart-
ment may:
(a) Notwithstanding ORS 633.015 (1), suspend, revoke or refuse to issue or  renew a cer-
tificate of registration, under ORS 633.015, to or for the person to whom the final order  is
issued;
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 633.029 (1)(a), suspend, revoke or refuse to  issue or renew a li-
cense, under ORS 633.029, to or for the person to whom the final order is issued; and
(c) Withhold from the person to whom the final order is issued  the issuance or renewal
of a license or  certificate of registration under any other program administered by the de-
partment.
Enrolled Senate Bill 832 (SB 832-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate June 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 832 (SB 832-A) Page 3